Washington statutes.
RCW 6.28.060

Execution of conveyance.

It shall be sufficient for the conveyance to be signed by the commissioner only, without affixing the name of the parties whose title is conveyed, but the names of the parties shall be recited in the body of the conveyance.

[Code 1881 s 533; 1877 p 112 s 537; 1854 p 205 s 395; RRS s 610.]